New York, session 2025-2026, A5550.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new 2 section 140.60 to read as follows: 3 § 140.60 Appearance tickets. 4 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, a 5 police officer or peace officer shall not arrest a person for an offense 6 described in subdivision three of this section, unless one of the condi- 7 tions in subdivision two of this section applies. A police officer or 8 peace office may issue either an appearance ticket requiring such person 9 to appear before a local criminal court at a designated future time in 10 connection with an accusatory instrument to be filed against such person 11 therein or a notice of violation and hearing to commence a proceeding to 12 recover a civil penalty in an administrative proceeding before an admin- 13 istrative tribunal having jurisdiction over such proceeding in lieu of 14 making an arrest. 15 2. A police officer, acting pursuant to section 140.10 of this arti- 16 cle, or a peace officer, acting pursuant to section 140.25 of this arti- 17 cle, may arrest a person for an offense described in subdivision three 18 of this section only if: 19 (a) the officer is unable to ascertain the person's identity. An offi- 20 cer may rely on various factors relevant to establishing identity in 21 ascertaining a person's identity, including but not limited to personal 22 knowledge of such person, such person's self-identification, and photo- 23 graphic identification. There is no requirement that a person present EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07745-01-5 A. 5550 2 1 photographic identification in order to be issued an appearance ticket 2 in lieu of arrest; however, if offered by such person, an officer shall 3 accept as evidence of identity forms of identification including but not 4 limited to a valid driver's license or non-driver identification card 5 issued by the commissioner of motor vehicles, the federal government,any 6 United States territory, commonwealth or possession, the District of 7 Columbia, a state government or municipal government within the United 8 States or a provincial government of the dominion of Canada; a valid 9 passport issued by the United States government or any other country; 10 and identification card issued by the armed forces of the United States; 11 and an electronic benefit transfer card; 12 (b) the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person has 13 committed a crime in addition to an offense described in subdivision 14 three of this section; or 15 (c) the person presents an immediate threat of bodily injury to that 16 person or another. 17 3. This section shall apply to the enforcement of the following 18 offenses: 19 (a) A petty offense, as defined in subdivision thirty-nine of section 20 1.20 of this chapter; 21 (b) An offense contained in title 21 of chapter XXI of subchapter D of 22 the state codes, rules and regulations; 23 (c) An offense contained in chapter 1 of title 56 of the New York City 24 rules and regulations; and 25 (d) A violation of section 153.09 of the New York City health code. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 27 have become a law.